Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.230

Oath of applicant.

For all voter registrations, the registrant shall sign the following oath:

"I declare that the facts on this voter registration form are true. I am a citizen of the United States, I will have lived at this address in Washington for at least thirty days immediately before the next election at which I vote, and I am at least sixteen years old. I am not disqualified from voting due to a court order, and I am not currently serving a sentence of total confinement under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections for a Washington felony conviction, and I am not currently incarcerated for a federal or out-of-state felony conviction."

[ 2021 c 10 s 2; 2020 c 208 s 4; 2013 c 11 s 14; 2009 c 369 s 17; 2003 c 111 s 218; 1994 c 57 s 12; 1990 c 143 s 8; 1973 1st ex.s. c 21 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 10; 1965 c 9 s 29.07.080. Prior: 1933 c 1 s 12; RRS s 5114-12. Formerly RCW 29.07.080.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.08.520.

Short title—Findings—2020 c 208: See notes following RCW 29A.08.210.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

Effective date—1990 c 143 ss 1-8: See note following RCW 29A.08.340.

Civil rights

loss of: State Constitution Art. 6 s 3, RCW 29A.08.520.

restoration of: RCW 9.92.066, 9.94A.637, 9.94A.885, 9.95.260, chapter 9.96 RCW.